Hawaii statutes.
§457G-1.5 Practice of occupational therapy.
(a) The practice of occupational therapy is the therapeutic use of everyday
life activities with individuals or groups for the purpose of participation in
roles and situations in home, school, workplace, community, and other
settings. It includes:

(1) Evaluation of factors affecting activities of
daily living, instrumental activities of daily living, rest and sleep,
education, work, play, leisure, and social participation, including:

(A) Client factors, including body functions,
such as neuromusculoskeletal, sensory-perceptual, visual, mental, cognitive,
and pain factors; body structures, such as cardiovascular, digestive, nervous,
integumentary, genitourinary systems, and structures related to movement, values,
beliefs, and spirituality;

(B) Habits, routines, roles, rituals, and
behavior patterns;

(C) Occupational and social environments,
cultural, personal, temporal, and virtual contexts and activity demands that
affect performance; and

(D) Performance skills, including motor and
praxis, sensory-perceptual, emotional regulation, cognitive, communication, and
social skills;

(2) Methods or approaches selected to direct the
process of interventions, including:

(A) Establishment, remediation, or restoration
of a skill or ability that has not yet developed, is impaired, or is in
decline;

(B) Compensation, modification, or adaptation
of activity or environment to enhance performance or prevent injuries,
disorders, or other conditions;

(C) Retention and enhancement of skills or
abilities without which performance in everyday life activities would decline;

(D) Promotion of health and wellness,
including the use of self-management strategies, to enable or enhance
performance in everyday life activities; and

(E) Prevention of barriers to performance and
participation, including injury and disability prevention; and

(3) Interventions and procedures to promote or
enhance safety and performance in activities of daily living, instrumental
activities of daily living, rest and sleep, education, work, play, leisure, and
social participation, including:

(A) Therapeutic use of occupations,
exercises, and activities;

(B) Training in self-care, self-management,
health management and maintenance, home management, community reintegration,
work reintegration, school activities, and work performance;

(C) Development, remediation, or compensation
of neuromusculoskeletal, sensory-perceptual, visual, mental, and cognitive
functions; pain tolerance and management; and behavioral skills;

(D) Therapeutic use of self, including one's
personality, insights, perceptions, and judgments, as part of the therapeutic
process;

(E) Education and training of individuals,
including family members, caregivers, groups, populations, and others;

(F) Care coordination, case management, and
transition services;

(G) Consultative services to groups,
programs, organizations, or communities;

(H) Modification of environments, such as
home, work, school, or community, and adaptation of processes, including the
application of ergonomic principles;

(I) Assessment, design, fabrication,
application, fitting, and training in seating and positioning; assistive
technology; adaptive devices; orthotic devices; and training in the use of
prosthetic devices;

(J) Assessment, recommendation, and training
in techniques to enhance functional mobility, including management of
wheelchairs and other mobility devices;

(K) Low vision rehabilitation;

(L) Driver rehabilitation and community
mobility;

(M) Management of feeding, eating, and
swallowing to enable eating and feeding performance;

(N) Application of physical agent modalities
and use of a range of specific therapeutic procedures, such as wound care
management, interventions to enhance sensory-perceptual and cognitive
processing, and manual therapy, to enhance performance skills; and

(O) Facilitating the occupational performance
of groups, populations, or organizations through the modification of
environments and the adaptation of processes.

(b) No person shall engage in the practice of
occupational therapy gratuitously or for pay, offer to practice occupational
therapy, offer occupational therapy, or represent, advertise, or announce,
either publicly or privately, that the person is an occupational therapist,
unless the person is appropriately licensed under this chapter.

(c) No person shall use, in connection with
the person's name or business, the words "occupational therapist
licensed", "registered occupational therapist", "licensed
occupational therapist", "occupational therapist", or
"doctor of occupational therapy", or the letters "OT",
"OTR", "OTD", "OT/L", "OTR/L",
or "OTD/L", or any other words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia
indicating or implying that the person is an occupational therapist unless the
person is appropriately licensed as an occupational therapist under this
chapter.

(d) Effective January 1, 2017, except as
otherwise provided in this chapter, no person shall engage in the practice of
occupational therapy or represent the person's self as able to practice as an
occupational therapy assistant in the State unless:

(1) The practice is done under the supervision of and
in partnership with an occupational therapist who is licensed to practice
occupational therapy in the State; and

(2) The person possesses a valid license issued
pursuant to this chapter to practice occupational therapy as an occupational
therapy assistant.

(e) No person shall use the title
"occupational therapy assistant licensed", "licensed occupational
therapy assistant", the letters "OTA/L" or "COTA/L",
or any other words, letters, abbreviations, or insignia indicating or implying
that the person is an occupational therapy assistant unless that person is
appropriately licensed as an occupational therapy assistant under this chapter.
[L 1978, c 146, pt of §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1998, c 100, §2; am L 2001, c 198,
§2; am L 2003, c 97, §3; am L 2014, c 209, §4]

Note

This section was renumbered from §457G-1.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next